Louisiana, session 2026, HB1038.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:1881(A) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 13:1881(C)
through (F) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
A. The city or ward marshal is shall be the executive officer of the court; he
and shall execute the orders and mandates of the court and in the. In the execution
thereof of these orders and mandates, and in making arrests and preserving the peace,
he has the same powers and authority of a sheriff. the city or ward marshal shall be
considered a peace officer as defined in R.S. 40:2402 with all the powers and
authority of regular law enforcement officers of this state except as provided in
Subsections C and D of this Section. The city or ward marshal and his deputy
marshals shall be considered officers of a public entity for the purposes of immunity
from liability as provided in R.S. 9:2793.1.
* * *
C.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to contrary, any city or ward
marshal who serves a population of forty thousand or less as provided in the most
recent federal decennial census has, along with his deputy marshals, the following
enumerated powers:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1038 ENROLLED
(a) Execution of attachments, bench warrants, or any other orders of arrest
issued by a city court within the territorial jurisdiction of the marshal.
(b) Detainment or the taking into custody of an individual only when
reasonably necessary to effectuate the service or execution of any of the following:
(i) Civil writs.
(ii) Notices of eviction.
(iii) Orders of seizure or attachment.
(iv) Any other civil process lawfully issued by a city court.
(c) Detainment or effecting the arrest of an individual upon order of the city
court for acts occurring in the city court's presence or on the grounds of the city court
that constitute direct contempt.
(d) Detainment or effecting the arrest of an individual for any violation of
Title 14 or 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 or a local or municipal
ordinance in the city court's presence or on the grounds of the city court.
(2) In any declared state of emergency issued by both the governor and the
local governing authority pursuant to R.S. 29:721 et seq., the city or ward marshal
and his deputy marshals have all the powers and authority of regular law
enforcement officers of this state during the duration of any emergency or until such
declaration has ceased.
(3) In any permitted special event, the city or ward marshal shall coordinate
with the local governing authority that permitted the event and has all of the powers
and authority of regular law enforcement officers of this state during the event. The
city or ward marshal and each deputy marshal shall coordinate with the local
governing authority that permitted the event for coordination of law enforcement
duties and responsibilities.
(4) Nothing in this Subsection limits the city or ward marshal or his deputy
marshals from engaging in public services that include but are not limited to
locksmithing, escorts for funeral processions, and duties as a traffic control officer.
(5) This Subsection shall not apply to any marshal who also serves as the
chief of police for the municipality.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1038 ENROLLED
D.(1) Unless expressly authorized by the local governing authority where the
city or ward marshal has territorial jurisdiction, no city or ward marshal or deputy
marshal who serves a population of forty thousand or less as provided in the most
recent federal decennial census shall do any of the following:
(a) Exercise general law enforcement authority.
(b) Conduct traffic stops, criminal investigations, or arrests without a warrant
for alleged violations of criminal law.
(c) Execute arrest warrants issued by any court other than the city court of
the marshal's territorial jurisdiction.
(d) Obtain a commission from any law enforcement agency that has primary
jurisdiction over the area of the marshal's territorial jurisdiction.
(2) Nothing in this Subsection shall prohibit a city or ward marshal or deputy
marshal from requesting assistance from or coordinating with any of the following:
(a) State law enforcement agencies.
(b) Parish sheriffs offices.
(c) Municipal police departments.
(3) Any arrest powers exercised in coordination with the law enforcement
agencies described in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection shall be carried out solely by
the authorized law enforcement agency unless otherwise provided by law.
(4) Any city or ward marshal or deputy marshal who acts outside the scope
of authority provided in this Subsection may be held civilly liable for his actions.
(5) This Subsection shall not apply to any city or ward marshal who also
serves as the chief of police for the municipality.
E.(1) Nothing in Subsection D of this Section shall prohibit any local
governing authority from enacting an ordinance that confers a city or ward marshal
or deputy marshal with the same powers and duties as a peace officer as provided in
Subsection A of this Section.
(2) If a city marshal's jurisdiction extends into a ward, the local governing
authority where the city court is domiciled shall serve as the governing authority
authorized to enact an ordinance that confers a marshal or deputy marshal with the
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1038 ENROLLED
same powers and duties as a peace officer as provided in Subsection A of this
Section.
F. Nothing in this Section shall affect, impair, or restrict the supplemental
pay that a city or ward marshal or deputy marshal shall be entitled to pursuant to R.S.
40:1667.1.
Section 2. R.S.40:2402(introductory paragraph) and (3)(b) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§2402. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
* * *
(3)
* * *
(b)(i) "Peace officer" shall also include those sheriff's deputies whose duties
include the care, custody, and control of inmates.
(ii) "Peace officer" shall also include any deputy marshal of a city or ward
marshal as provided in R.S. 13:1881.
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.